New York, session 2025-2026, S7390.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of part N of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023 2 amending the real property tax law and the state administrative proce- 3 dure act relating to clarifying the solar or wind energy system 4 appraisal model, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. 1. No assessing unit that failed to use the appraisal model 6 pursuant to section 575-b of the real property tax law in 2022 shall be 7 held liable for failing to use such model in 2022. Within fifteen days 8 from the effective date of this act, the commissioner of taxation and 9 finance may readopt the 2022 appraisal model or models and discount 10 rates for use in 2023, without additional consultation with the New York 11 state energy research and development authority or the New York state 12 assessors association, and without soliciting or considering additional 13 public comments. 14 2. The appraisal model or models and discount rates developed pursuant 15 to section 575-b of the real property tax law shall not apply to the 16 assessed value for any solar or wind energy projects in the county of 17 Lewis already in existence on the effective date of this act. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 19 have been in full force and effect on and after the effective date of 20 part N of chapter 59 of the laws of 2023. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05557-01-5